Massachusetts, session 194th, H1785.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 172A of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 6, after the word “chapter 258B,”, the
following:-
“or for a request made by a parent or legal guardian or legal custodian for the criminal
record information of a childcare provider who has or may have direct contact with a child of
such parent or a child under the care of such legal guardian or legal custodian,”
of 1